Nevada, session 83, AB409.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 482.3763 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
482.3763 1. The Director shall order the preparation of
special license plates for the support of outreach programs and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
services for veterans and their families and establish procedures for
the application for and issuance of the plates.
2. The Department shall, upon application therefor and
payment of the prescribed fees, issue special license plates for the
support of outreach programs and services for veterans and their
families to:
(a) A veteran of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps , [or]
Coast Guard or Space Force of the United States, a reserve
component thereof or the National Guard;
(b) A female veteran; or
(c) The spouse, parent or child of a person described in
paragraph (a) or (b).
 The plates must be inscribed with the word “VETERAN” and
with the seal of the branch of the Armed Forces of the United States,
the seal of the National Guard or an image representative of the
female veterans, as applicable, requested by the applicant. A person
may request that personalized prestige license plates issued pursuant
to NRS 482.3667 be combined with special license plates for the
support of outreach programs and services for veterans and their
families if that person pays the fees for the personalized prestige
license plates in addition to the fees for the special license plates for
the support of outreach programs and services for veterans and their
families pursuant to subsection 4.
3. If, during a registration period, the holder of special plates
issued pursuant to this section disposes of the vehicle to which the
plates are affixed, the holder shall:
(a) Retain the plates and affix them to another vehicle which
meets the requirements of this section if the holder pays the fee for
the transfer of the registration and any registration fee or
governmental services tax due pursuant to NRS 482.399; or
(b) Within 30 days after removing the plates from the vehicle,
return them to the Department.
4. In addition to all other applicable registration and license
fees and governmental services taxes, and to the special fee imposed
pursuant to NRS 482.3764 for the support of outreach programs and
services for veterans and their families, the fee for:
(a) The initial issuance of the special license plates is $35.
(b) The annual renewal sticker is $10.
5. If the special plates issued pursuant to this section are lost,
stolen or mutilated, the owner of the vehicle may secure a set of
duplicate number plates from the Department for a fee of $10.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 1.5. NRS 482.3783 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.3783 1. The Department shall design, prepare and issue
license plates honoring veterans of the Armed Forces of the United
States who have been awarded, as applicable, the:
(a) Silver Star; [or]
(b) Bronze Star Medal with “V” device, Combat V or Combat
Distinguishing Device [.] ;
(c) Air Force Cross;
(d) Coast Guard Cross;
(e) Distinguished Service Cross; or
(f) Navy Cross.
2. A person who qualifies for special license plates pursuant to
this section, has suffered a qualifying service-connected disability as
a result of his or her service in the Armed Forces of the United
States and receives compensation from the United States for the
disability is entitled to have his or her special license plates issued
pursuant to this section inscribed with the international symbol of
access, which must comply with the applicable federal standards
and must be white on a blue background.
3. Each person who qualifies for special license plates pursuant
to this section may apply for not more than two sets of plates. If the
person applies for a second set of plates for an additional vehicle,
the second set of plates must have a different number than the first
set of plates issued to the same applicant. Special license plates
issued pursuant to this section may only be used on a private
passenger vehicle, a noncommercial truck or a motor home.
4. The Department shall issue specially designed license plates
for any person qualified pursuant to this section who submits an
application on a form prescribed by the Department and evidence of
his or her status as a recipient of [the Silver Star or the Bronze Star
Medal with “V” device, Combat V or Combat Distinguishing
Device, as applicable,] an award listed in subsection 1 and, subject
to the provisions of NRS 417.0187, evidence of his or her service-
connected disability, if applicable, as required by the Department.
The Department may designate any appropriate colors for the
special plates.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a vehicle on
which license plates issued by the Department pursuant to
subsection 2 are displayed is exempt from the payment of any
parking fees, including, without limitation, those collected through
parking meters, charged by the State or any political subdivision or
other public body within this State, other than the United States.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
6. If, during a registration year, the holder of a set of special
license plates issued pursuant to the provisions of this section
disposes of the vehicle to which the plates are affixed, the holder
shall:
(a) Retain the plates and affix them to another vehicle which
meets the requirements of this section and report the change to the
Department in accordance with the procedure set forth for other
transfers; or
(b) Within 30 days after removing the plates from the vehicle,
return them to the Department.
7. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no fee in
addition to the applicable registration and license fees and
governmental services taxes may be charged for the issuance or
renewal of a set of special license plates pursuant to this section. If
the special license plates issued pursuant to this section are lost,
stolen or mutilated, the owner of the vehicle may secure a set of
duplicate number plates from the Department for the fees required
pursuant to NRS 482.268.
Sec. 2. NRS 482.3785 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.3785 1. Each family member of a person killed in the
line of duty while on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United
States is entitled to specially designed license plates which indicate
that the person is a family member of a person killed in the line of
duty while on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States.
2. Each person who qualifies for special license plates pursuant
to this section may apply for not more than two sets of plates. If the
person applies for a second set of plates for an additional vehicle,
the second set of plates must have a different number than the first
set of plates issued to the same applicant. Special license plates
issued pursuant to this section may be used only on a private
passenger vehicle, a noncommercial truck or a motor home.
3. The Department shall issue specially designed license plates
for any person qualified pursuant to this section who submits an
application on a form prescribed by the Department and evidence
satisfactory to the Department that the person is a family member of
a person killed in the line of duty while on active duty in the Armed
Forces of the United States. The Department may designate any
appropriate colors for the special plates, but must ensure that the
design of the plates includes a gold star.
4. A vehicle on which license plates issued by the Department
pursuant to this section are displayed is exempt from the payment of
any parking fees, including, without limitation, those collected
through parking meters, charged by the State or any political
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
subdivision or other public body within this State, other than the
United States.
5. If, during a registration year, the holder of a set of special
license plates issued pursuant to the provisions of this section
disposes of the vehicle to which the plates are affixed, the holder
shall:
(a) Retain the plates and affix them to another vehicle which
meets the requirements of this section and report the change to the
Department in accordance with the procedure set forth for other
transfers; or
(b) Within 30 days after removing the plates from the vehicle,
return them to the Department.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no fee in
addition to the applicable registration and license fees and
governmental services taxes may be charged for the issuance or
renewal of a set of special license plates pursuant to this section. If
the special plates issued pursuant to this section are lost, stolen or
mutilated, the owner of the vehicle may secure a set of duplicate
number plates from the Department for the fees required pursuant to
NRS 482.268.
7. A person may request that personalized prestige license
plates issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 be combined with license
plates issued pursuant to this section if the person pays the fees
prescribed by NRS 482.367 for the personalized prestige license
plates.
8. Any person who knowingly:
(a) Makes a false statement that he or she is a family member of
a person killed in the line of duty while on active duty in the Armed
Forces of the United States on an application for special license
plates pursuant to this section; or
(b) Submits any evidence pursuant to subsection 3 that is false,
fraudulent or misleading,
 is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine not to
exceed $1,000. In addition, he or she shall surrender to the
Department any license plates issued pursuant to this section.
[8.] 9. As used in this section:
(a) “Family member” means a widow, widower, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, child, stepchild, dependent, sibling, half
sibling or stepsibling.
(b) “Killed in the line of duty while on active duty in the Armed
Forces of the United States” includes persons killed directly in the
line of duty and persons who die as a result of injuries sustained in
the line of duty.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Sec. 3. NRS 482.3787 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.3787 1. Each family member of a person who died as a
result of injuries sustained while on active duty in the Armed Forces
of the United States is entitled to specially designed license plates
which indicate that the person is a family member of a person who
died as a result of injuries sustained while on active duty in the
Armed Forces of the United States.
2. Each person who qualifies for special license plates pursuant
to this section may apply for not more than two sets of plates. If the
person applies for a second set of plates for an additional vehicle,
the second set of plates must have a different number than the first
set of plates issued to the same applicant. Special license plates
issued pursuant to this section may be used only on a private
passenger vehicle, a noncommercial truck or a motor home.
3. The Department shall issue specially designed license plates
for any person qualified pursuant to this section who submits an
application on a form prescribed by the Department and evidence
satisfactory to the Department that the person is a family member of
a person who died as a result of injuries sustained while on active
duty in the Armed Forces of the United States. The Department may
designate any appropriate colors for the special plates.
4. A vehicle on which license plates issued by the Department
pursuant to this section are displayed is exempt from the payment of
any parking fees, including, without limitation, those collected
through parking meters, charged by the State or any political
subdivision or other public body within this State, other than the
United States.
5. If, during a registration year, the holder of a set of special
license plates issued pursuant to the provisions of this section
disposes of the vehicle to which the plates are affixed, the holder
shall:
(a) Retain the plates and affix them to another vehicle which
meets the requirements of this section and report the change to the
Department in accordance with the procedure set forth for other
transfers; or
(b) Within 30 days after removing the plates from the vehicle,
return them to the Department.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no fee in
addition to the applicable registration and license fees and
governmental services taxes may be charged for the issuance or
renewal of a set of special license plates pursuant to this section. If
the special plates issued pursuant to this section are lost, stolen or
mutilated, the owner of the vehicle may secure a set of duplicate
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
number plates from the Department for the fees required pursuant to
NRS 482.268.
7. A person may request that personalized prestige license
plates issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 be combined with license
plates issued pursuant to this section if the person pays the fees
prescribed by NRS 482.367 for the personalized prestige license
plates.
8. Any person who knowingly:
(a) Makes a false statement that he or she is a family member of
a person who died as a result of injuries sustained while on active
duty in the Armed Forces of the United States on an application for
special license plates pursuant to this section; or
(b) Submits any evidence pursuant to subsection 3 that is false,
fraudulent or misleading,
 is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine not to
exceed $1,000. In addition, he or she shall surrender to the
Department any license plates issued pursuant to this section.
[8.] 9. As used in this section:
(a) “Died as a result of injuries sustained while on active duty in
the Armed Forces of the United States” includes persons who die as
a result of an injury sustained while on active duty whether or not
the person had been discharged from military service at the time of
his or her death.
(b) “Family member” means a widow, widower, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, child, stepchild, dependent, sibling, half
sibling or stepsibling.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)